Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4110.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Attending physician” means the physician who has primary responsibility for the
care of a patient.
(b) “Ibogaine” means a naturally occurring indole alkaloid extracted from the root bark
of the Tabernanthe iboga shrub.
(c) “Physician” means a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy licensed under ORS
chapter 677.
(2)(a) An attending physician of a patient who meets the criteria listed in paragraph (b)
of this subsection may provide ibogaine to the patient for the patient’s consumption to treat
the patient’s diagnosed post-traumatic stress disorder, major depressive disorder, anxiety
disorder or substance use disorder, if in the attending physician’s judgment, the patient’s
disorder may benefit from the consumption of ibogaine.
(b) In order to receive ibogaine under paragraph (a) of this subsection, a patient must:
(A) Be at least 18 years of age; and
(B) In the opinion of the patient’s attending physician, be able to make and communicate
health care decisions to a health care provider, either directly or through individuals familiar
with the patient’s manner of communicating.
(3) The consumption of ibogaine must occur in a controlled setting:
(a) Where a health care provider who is experienced in managing cardiac complications
is available on site; and
(b) That is created in consideration of the needs of the patient experiencing the effects
of ibogaine consumption.
(4)(a) The Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Medical Board may adopt rules to
carry out this section.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 42

HB 4110
(b) The board may not discipline an attending physician who provides ibogaine to a pa-
tient in accordance with this section.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to:
(a) Require a person to violate federal law; or
(b) Exempt a person from federal law or obstruct the enforcement of federal law.
SECTION 2. ORS 475.005 is amended to read:
475.005. As used in ORS 475.005 to 475.285 and 475.752 to 475.980, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Abuse” means the repetitive excessive use of a drug short of dependence, without legal or
medical supervision, which may have a detrimental effect on the individual or society.
(2) “Administer” means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or an authorized agent thereof; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(3) “Administration” means the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Depart-
ment of Justice, or its successor agency.
(4) “Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a man-
ufacturer, distributor or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public
warehouseman or employee of the carrier or warehouseman.
(5) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
(6) “Controlled substance”:
(a) Means a drug or its immediate precursor classified in Schedules I through V under the fed-
eral Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. 811 to 812, as modified under ORS 475.035. The use of the
term “precursor” in this paragraph does not control and is not controlled by the use of the term
“precursor” in ORS 475.752 to 475.980.
(b) Does not include:
(A) The plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(B) Any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae, whether growing or not;
(C) Resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(D) The seeds of the plant Cannabis family Cannabaceae;
(E) Any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of a plant, part of a
plant, resin or seed described in this paragraph; [or]
(F) Psilocybin or psilocin, but only if and to the extent that a person manufactures, delivers, or
possesses psilocybin, psilocin, or psilocybin products in accordance with the provisions of ORS
475A.210 to 475A.722 and rules adopted under ORS 475A.210 to 475A.722[.]; or
(G) Ibogaine, as defined in section 1 of this 2026 Act, to the extent that ibogaine is ob-
tained, provided and consumed pursuant to section 1 of this 2026 Act.
(7) “Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance or its container or labeling, which,
without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number
or device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor or dispenser other than the person
who in fact manufactured, delivered or dispensed the substance.
(8) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted transfer of, or possession
with the intent to transfer, other than by administering or dispensing, from one person to another,
a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.
(9) “Device” means instruments, apparatus or contrivances, including their components, parts
[2]

HB 4110
or accessories, intended:
(a) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in humans or
animals; or
(b) To affect the structure of any function of the body of humans or animals.
(10) “Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject
by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, and includes the prescribing, administering,
packaging, labeling or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery.
(11) “Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses.
(12) “Distributor” means a person who delivers.
(13) “Drug” means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official
Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States or official National Formulary, or any supplement
to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of
disease in humans or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
humans or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in paragraph (a), (b) or
(c) of this subsection; however, the term does not include devices or their components, parts or ac-
cessories.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission” means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or any similar apparatus having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances
of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the preparation or compounding
of a controlled substance:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in
the course of professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner, or by an authorized agent under the practitioner’s supervision, for the
purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(16) “Person” includes a government subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust or any
other legal entity.
(17)(a) “Practitioner” means a physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific investigator, licensed
nurse practitioner, physician associate or other person licensed, registered or otherwise permitted
by law to dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the
course of professional practice or research in this state.
(b) “Practitioner” does not include a pharmacist or pharmacy for purposes of the prescription,
dispensation or administration of a controlled substance that is not:
(A) Listed in Schedule II, III, IV or V; and
(B) A medication for the treatment of opioid use disorder.
(18) “Prescription” means a written, oral or electronically transmitted direction, given by a
[3]

HB 4110
practitioner for the preparation and use of a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also
means the drug prepared under such written, oral or electronically transmitted direction. Any label
affixed to a drug prepared under written, oral or electronically transmitted direction shall promi-
nently display a warning that the removal thereof is prohibited by law.
(19) “Production” includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing or harvesting of a
controlled substance.
(20) “Research” means an activity conducted by the person registered with the federal Drug
Enforcement Administration pursuant to a protocol approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(21) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the use
of the person or for the use of a member of the household of the person or for administering to an
animal owned by the person or by a member of the household of the person.
(22) “Usable quantity” means:
(a) An amount of a controlled substance that is sufficient to physically weigh independent of its
packaging and that does not fall below the uncertainty of the measuring scale; or
(b) An amount of a controlled substance that has not been deemed unweighable, as determined
by a Department of State Police forensic laboratory, due to the circumstances of the controlled
substance.
(23) “Within 30 feet,” “within 500 feet” and “within 1,000 feet” mean a straight line measure-
ment in a radius extending for the specified number of feet or less in every direction from a specified
location or from any point on the boundary line of a specified unit of property.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2026 Act and the amendments to ORS 475.005 by section
2 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority and the Oregon Medical Board may take any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the authority and the board to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in sub-
section (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority
and the board by section 1 of this 2026 Act and the amendments to ORS 475.005 by section
2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[4]